Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-944.01
United States Military, defined.

United States Military means any active duty or reserve duty component of the armed forces of the United States, any state of the United States, or any territory of the United States.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 7.